West Virginia, session 2026, SB965.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. PUBLIC RECORDS MANAGEMENT AND PRESERVATION ACT. §5A-8-21a. Limited access to personal information for protected individuals. (a) As used in this section, the term "protected individual" shall mean a current or retired district attorney, assistant district attorney, or district attorney investigator.(b) A protected individual, or the judicial administrator's office on behalf of a protected individual, may request that a public body or third party withhold their information from disclosure.(c) A request made under this section shall provide sufficient information to confirm that the requester is a protected individual, and that a request made by the judicial administrator's office certifies that a requester is a protected individual, and no further information may be required to confirm that the requester is a protected individual.(d) A protected individual or the judicial administrator's office may bring an action for mandamus due to a violation of this section against a public body or third party.(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an individual who is recognized as a protected individual shall not be exempt from publication or removal of his personal information from records publicly posted by the office of the Secretary of State.(f) This section shall become effective on July 1, 2026.